Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1208.02
Parimutuel wagering; Department of Revenue; taxes due; duties.

(1) The Department of Revenue shall audit and verify the amount of the tax that is due the state as provided by sections 2-1208 to 2-1208.02.

(2) The pertinent provisions of sections 77-2708 to 77-2713, 77-27,125 to 77-27,131, and 77-27,133 to 77-27,135, shall be applicable to the administration and collection of the tax imposed by section 2-1208.01, except that the information obtained by the Department of Revenue in its audit and enforcement activities shall continue to be public records as defined in section 84-712.01.

Laws 1959, c. 5, § 4, p. 74;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 50.